Arkansas, session 2025, HB1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-23-108(e), concerning commercial driver
license qualification standards, is repealed.
(e) Human Trafficking Prevention Training.
(1) A person may be issued a Class A commercial driver license
only if he or she:
(A) Completes a human trafficking prevention course
administered by the division or by a third party approved by the division to
present a human trafficking prevention course under regulations promulgated
as provided in this section; or
(B) Becomes a Certified Trucker Against Trafficking by
completing the online certification course offered by Truckers Against
Trafficking and provides evidence of completion to the Department of Finance
and Administration with his or her application for a commercial driver
license under § 27-23-110.
*ZRC046*
02-20-2025 11:16:12 ZRC046

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 HB1371
(2) A person who currently holds a Class A commercial driver
license is not required to comply with this subsection when applying for
renewal of the commercial driver license as required by § 27-23-111(g) so
long as he or she has completed the human trafficking prevention training
required under subdivision (e)(1) of this section at least once.

/s/Wardlaw





























02-20-2025 11:16:12 ZRC046